North Carolina statutes. Chapter 160A. Cities and Towns.
Article 19. Planning and Regulation of Development. [Repealed]

§§ 160A-360 through 160A-459.1.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2019-111, s. 2.3, as amended by Session Laws 2020-3, s. 4.33(a), and Session Laws 2020-25, s. 51(a), (b), (d), effective June 19, 2020.

History.

G.S. 160A-360

; 1959, c. 1204; 1961, c. 103; c. 548, ss. 1, 13/4; c. 1217; 1963, cc. 519, 889, 1076, 1105; 1965, c. 121; c. 348, s. 2; c. 450, s. 1; c. 864, ss. 3-6; 1967, cc. 15, 22, 149; c. 197, s. 2; cc. 246, 685; c. 1208, s. 3; 1969, cc. 11, 53; c. 1010, s. 5; c. 1099; 1971, c. 698, s. 1; c. 1076, s. 3; 1973, c. 426, s. 56; c. 525; c. 669, s. 1; 1977, c. 882; c. 912, ss. 2, 4; 1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 746, s. 1; 2005-418, s. 10; 2011-34, ss. 1, 2; 2011-363, s. 4; 2014-120, s. 15; repealed by 2019-111, s. 2.3, as amended by 2020-3, s. 4.33(a), 2020-25, s. 51(a), (b), (d), effective June 19, 2020.

G.S. 160A-360

.1; 2014-120, s. 16(c); repealed by 2019-111, s. 2.3, as amended by 2020-3, s. 4.33(a), 2020-25, s. 51(a), (b), (d), effective June 19, 2020. G.S. 160A-361; 1919, c. 23, s. 1; C.S., s. 2643; 1945, c. 1040, s. 2; 1955, cc. 489, 1252; 1959, c. 327, s. 2; c. 390; 1971, c. 698, s. 1; 1973, c. 426, s. 57; 1979, 2nd Sess., c. 1247, s. 35; 1997-309, s. 7; 1997-456, s. 27; 2004-199, s. 41(a); repealed by 2019-111, s. 2.3, as amended by 2020-3, s. 4.33(a), 2020-25, s. 51(a), (b), (d), effective June 19, 2020. G.S. 160A-362; 1959, c. 1204; 1961, c. 103; c. 548, ss. 1, 13/4; c. 1217; 1963, cc. 519, 889, 1076, 1105; 1965, c. 121; c. 348, s. 2; c. 450, s. 1; c. 864, ss. 3-6; 1967, cc. 15, 22, 149; c. 197, s. 2; cc. 246, 685; c. 1208, s. 3; 1969, cc. 11, 53; c. 1010, s. 5; c. 1099; 1971, c. 698, s. 1; 1983, c. 584, ss. 1-4; 1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 746, s. 2; 2005-418, s. 11; repealed by 2019-111, s. 2.3, as amended by 2020-3, s. 4.33(a), 2020-25, s. 51(a), (b), (d), effective June 19, 2020. G.S. 160A-363; 1919, c. 23, s. 1; C.S., s. 2643; 1945, c. 1040, s. 2; 1955, cc. 489, 1252; 1959, c. 327, s. 2; c. 390; 1971, c. 698, s. 1; 1983, c. 377, s. 9; 2004-199, s. 41(b); 2005-418, s. 1(a); 2007-371, s. 2; repealed by 2019-111, s. 2.3, as amended by 2020-3, s. 4.33(a), 2020-25, s. 51(a), (b), (d), effective June 19, 2020. G.S. 160A-364; 1923, c. 250, s. 4; C.S., s. 2776(u); 1927, c. 90; 1955, c. 1334, s. 1; 1971, c. 698, s. 1; 1973, c. 426, s. 58; 1977, c. 912, s. 5; 1979, 2nd Sess., c. 1247, s. 36; 1981, c. 891, s. 1; 2004-75, s. 2; 2005-426, s. 1(a); repealed by 2019-111, s. 2.3, as amended by 2020-3, s. 4.33(a), 2020-25, s. 51(a), (b), (d), effective June 19, 2020. G.S. 160A-364.1; 1981, c. 891, s. 3; 1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 746, s. 7; 2011-326, s. 22(b); 2011-384, s. 4; 2013-413, s. 5(b); 2019-111, ss. 1.8; repealed by 2019-111, s. 2.3, as amended by 2020-3, s. 4.33(a), 2020-25, s. 51(a), (b), (d), effective June 19, 2020. G.S. 160A-365; 1971, c. 698, s. 1; 2015-246, s. 3; repealed by 2019-111, s. 2.3, as amended by 2020-3, s. 4.33(a), 2020-25, s. 51(a), (b), (d), effective June 19, 2020. G.S. 160A-366; 1973, c. 669, s. 2; repealed by 2019-111, s. 2.3, as amended by 2020-3, s. 4.33(a), 2020-25, s. 51(a), (b), (d), effective June 19, 2020. G.S. 160A-371; 1955, c. 1334, s. 1; 1971, c. 698, s. 1; 2005-418, s. 2(a); repealed by 2019-111, s. 2.3, as amended by 2020-3, s. 4.33(a), 2020-25, s. 51(a), (b), (d), effective June 19, 2020. G.S. 160A-372; 1955, c. 1334, s. 1; 1961, c. 1168; 1971, c. 698, s. 1; 1973, c. 426, s. 59; 1985, c. 146, ss. 1, 2; 1987, c. 747, ss. 9, 18; 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 1024, s. 39; 2005-426, s. 2(a); 2015-187, s. 1(a); 2017-40, s. 3(a); 2017-102, s. 31(a), (b); 2019-79, s. 1; 2019-174, s. 3(a); repealed by 2019-111, s. 2.3, as amended by 2020-3, s. 4.33(a), 2020-25, s. 51(a), (b), (d), effective June 19, 2020. G.S. 160A-373; 1955, c. 1334, s. 1; 1971, c. 698, s. 1; 1973, c. 426, s. 60; 1997-309, s. 8; 2005-418, s. 3(a); repealed by 2019-111, s. 2.3, as amended by 2020-3, s. 4.33(a), 2020-25, s. 51(a), (b), (d), effective June 19, 2020. G.S. 160A-374; 1955, c. 1334, s. 1; 1971, c. 698, s. 1; 1983 (Reg. Sess., 1984), c. 1080; 1985, c. 635; repealed by 2019-111, s. 2.3, as amended by 2020-3, s. 4.33(a), 2020-25, s. 51(a), (b), (d), effective June 19, 2020. G.S. 160A-375; 1955, c. 1334, s. 1; 1971, c. 698, s. 1; 1977, c. 820, s. 2; 1993, c. 539, s. 1087; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c); 2005-426, s. 3(a); repealed by 2019-111, s. 2.3, as amended by 2020-3, s. 4.33(a), 2020-25, s. 51(a), (b), (d), effective June 19, 2020. G.S. 160A-376; 1955, c. 1334, s. 1; 1971, c. 698, s. 1; 1973, c. 426, s. 61; 1977, c. 912, s. 6; 2003-284, s. 29.23(a); 2005-426, s. 4(a); 2017-10, s. 2.5(b); repealed by 2019-111, s. 2.3, as amended by 2020-3, s. 4.33(a), 2020-25, s. 51(a), (b), (d), effective June 19, 2020. G.S. 160A-377; 2009-421, s. 2(a); 2013-126, s. 12; repealed by 2019-111, s. 2.3, as amended by 2020-3, s. 4.33(a), 2020-25, s. 51(a), (b), (d), effective June 19, 2020. G.S. 160A-381; 1923, c. 250, s. 1; C.S., s. 2776(r); 1967, c. 1208, s. 1; 1971, c. 698, s. 1; 1981, c. 891, s. 5; 1985, c. 442, s. 1; 1987, c. 747, s. 11; 1995, c. 357, s. 1; 2005-426, s. 5(a); 2007-381, s. 2; 2011-286, s. 2; 2013-126, s. 4; 2013-413, s. 6(b); 2014-115, s. 17; 2015-86, s. 1; 2015-246, ss. 3.1(a), 4(b), 16; 2015-286, s. 1.8(b); 2019-111, s. 1.12; 2019-174, s. 3(b); repealed by 2019-111, s. 2.3, as amended by 2020-3, s. 4.33(a), 2020-25, s. 51(a), (b), (d), effective June 19, 2020. G.S. 160A-382; 1923, c. 250, s. 2; C.S., s. 2776(s); 1931, c. 176, s. 1; 1933, c. 7; 1963, c. 1058, s. 1; 1971, c. 698, s. 1; 1973, c. 426, s. 60; 1985, c. 607, s. 1; 2005-426, s. 6(a); 2019-111, s. 1.14; repealed by 2019-111, s. 2.3, as amended by 2020-3, s. 4.33(a), 2020-25, s. 51(a), (b), (d), effective June 19, 2020. G.S. 160A-383; 1923, c. 250, s. 3; C.S., s. 2776(t); 1971, c. 698, s. 1; 2005-426, s. 7(a); 2006-259, s. 28; 2017-10, s. 2.4(c); 2018-5, s. 34.18(b); repealed by 2019-111, s. 2.3, as amended by 2020-3, s. 4.33(a), 2020-25, s. 51(a), (b), (d), effective June 19, 2020. G.S. 160A-383.1; 1987, c. 805, s. 1; repealed by 2019-111, s. 2.3, as amended by 2020-3, s. 4.33(a), 2020-25, s. 51(a), (b), (d), effective June 19, 2020. G.S. 160A-383.2; 2005-390, s. 7; repealed by 2019-111, s. 2.3, as amended by 2020-3, s. 4.33(a), 2020-25, s. 51(a), (b), (d), effective June 19, 2020. G.S. 160A-383.3; 2007-147, s. 1; repealed by 2019-111, s. 2.3, as amended by 2020-3, s. 4.33(a), 2020-25, s. 51(a), (b), (d), effective June 19, 2020. G.S. 160A-383.4; 2007-241, ss. 1, 2; 2008-22, s. 1; 2009-95, s. 1; repealed by 2019-111, s. 2.3, as amended by 2020-3, s. 4.33(a), 2020-25, s. 51(a), (b), (d), effective June 19, 2020. G.S. 160A-383.5; 2014-94; repealed by 2019-111, s. 2.3, as amended by 2020-3, s. 4.33(a), 2020-25, s. 51(a), (b), (d), effective June 19, 2020. G.S. 160A-384; 1923, c. 250, s. 4; C.S., s. 2776(u); 1927, c. 90; 1971, c. 698, s. 1; 1985, c. 595, s. 2; 1987, c. 807, s. 1; 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 980, s. 1; 1993, c. 469, s. 1; 1995, c. 546, s. 1; 2005-418, s. 4(a); 2009-178, s. 2; 2019-111, s. 1.4; repealed by 2019-111, s. 2.3, as amended by 2020-3, s. 4.33(a), 2020-25, s. 51(a), (b), (d), effective June 19, 2020. G.S. 160A-385; 1923, c. 250, s. 5; C.S., s. 2776(v); 1959, c. 434, s. 1; 1965, c. 864, s. 1; 1971, c. 698, s. 1; 1977, c. 912, s. 7; 1985, c. 540, s. 2; 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 996, s. 1; 1991, c. 512, s. 4; 2005-418, s. 5; 2015-160, s. 1; 2016-111, s. 1; 2019-111, s. 1.3(a), (b); repealed by 2019-111, s. 2.3, as amended by 2020-3, s. 4.33(a), 2020-25, s. 51(a), (b), (d), effective June 19, 2020. G.S. 160A-385.1; 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 996, s. 2; 2016-111, s. 2; 2019-111, s. 1.3(c); repealed by 2019-111, s. 2.3, as amended by 2020-3, s. 4.33(a), 2020-25, s. 51(a), (b), (d), effective June 19, 2020. G.S. 160A-386; 1963, c. 1058, s. 2; 1971, c. 698, s. 1; 2005-418, s. 6; repealed by 2015-160, s. 2, effective August 1, 2015.

Cross References.

As to present similar provisions pertaining to Local Planning and Development Regulation, see

G.S. 160D-101

et seq.